California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(i) Violating any rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board and set forth in regulations duly adopted under this chapter.

(j) Being grossly negligent in the practice of their profession.

(k) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or regulations duly adopted thereunder.

(l) The aiding or abetting of any person to engage in the unlawful practice of psychology.

(m) The suspension, revocation or imposition of probationary conditions by another state or country of a license or certificate to
 practice psychology or as a psychological assistant issued by that state or country to a person also holding a license or registration issued under this chapter if the act for which the disciplinary action was taken constitutes a violation of this section.

(n) The commission of any dishonest, corrupt, or fraudulent act.

(o) (1) Any act of sexual
 abuse or sexual misconduct.

(2) Any act of sexual behavior or sexual contact with a client or former client within two years following termination of therapy.

(3) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Sexual abuse” means the touching of an intimate part of a person by force or coercion.

(B) “Sexual behavior” means inappropriate physical contact or communication of a sexual nature with a client or a former client for the purpose of sexual arousal, gratification, exploitation, or abuse. “Sexual behavior” does not include the provision of appropriate therapeutic interventions relating to sexual issues.

(C) “Sexual contact” means the touching of an intimate part of a client or a former client.

(D) “Sexual misconduct” means inappropriate conduct or communication of a sexual nature that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a psychologist or registered psychological associate.

(p) Functioning outside of their particular field or fields of competence as established by their education, training, and experience.

(q) Willful failure to submit, on behalf of an applicant for licensure, verification of supervised experience to the board.

(r) Repeated acts of negligence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.01.

(a) The board shall require an applicant for licensure as a psychologist, as defined in Section 2902, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 11.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.02.

(a) The Board of Psychology shall require an applicant for registration as a psychological associate, as defined in Section 2913, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to Section 144.

(b) The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 12.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.05.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (e), any accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code shall be filed within three years from the date the board discovers the alleged act or omission that is the basis for disciplinary action, or within seven years from the date the alleged act or omission that is the basis for disciplinary action occurred, whichever occurs first.

(b) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging the procurement of a license by fraud or misrepresentation is not subject to the limitations set forth in subdivision (a).

(c) The limitation provided for by subdivision (a) shall be tolled for the length of time required to obtain compliance when a report required to be filed by the licensee or registrant with the board pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 800) of Chapter 1 is not filed in a timely fashion.

(d) If an alleged act or omission involves a minor, the seven-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (a) and the 10-year limitations period provided for by subdivision (e) shall be tolled until the minor reaches the age of majority.

(e) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging sexual misconduct shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first. This subdivision shall apply to a complaint alleging sexual misconduct received by the board on and after January 1, 2002.

(f) The limitations period provided by subdivision (a) shall be tolled during any period if material evidence necessary for prosecuting or determining whether a disciplinary action would be appropriate is unavailable to the board due to an ongoing criminal investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 617, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.1.

Notwithstanding Section 2960, any proposed decision or decision issued under this chapter in accordance with the procedures set forth in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that contains any finding of fact that the licensee or registrant engaged in any act of sexual contact, as defined in Section 2960, shall contain an order of revocation. The revocation shall not be stayed by the administrative law judge. A proposed or issued decision that contains a finding that the licensee or registrant engaged in an act of sexual abuse, sexual behavior, or sexual misconduct, as those terms are defined in Section 2960, may contain an order of
 revocation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 298, Sec. 2.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.2.

A licensed psychologist shall meet the requirements set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 1031 of the Government Code prior to performing either of the following:

(a) An evaluation of an individual’s emotional and mental condition pursuant to Section 1031 of the Government Code.

(b) An evaluation of a public officer or peace officer’s fitness for duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 29.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.5.

The board may refuse to issue any registration or license whenever it appears that an applicant may be unable to practice their profession safely due to mental illness or chemical dependency. The procedures set forth in Article 12.5 (commencing with Section 820) of Chapter 1 shall apply to any denial of a license or registration pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 30.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2960.6.

The board may deny any application for, or may suspend or revoke a license or registration issued under this chapter for, either of the following:

(a) The revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary action, including the equivalent action of another jurisdiction’s licensing agency, on a license, certificate, or registration issued by that jurisdiction to practice psychology shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action for unprofessional conduct against that licensee or registrant in this state. A certified copy of the decision or judgment of the other jurisdiction shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(b) The
 revocation, suspension, or other disciplinary action by any board established in this division, or the equivalent action of another jurisdiction’s licensing agency, of the license of a healing arts practitioner shall constitute grounds for disciplinary action against that licensee or registrant under this chapter. The grounds for the action shall be substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant. A certified copy of the decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 31.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2961.

After a hearing pursuant to Section 2965, the board may deny an application for a license or registration, issue a license or registration subject to terms and conditions, or suspend, revoke, or impose probationary conditions upon, a license or registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 32.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2962.

(a) A person whose license or registration has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered, or who has been placed on probation, may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of the penalty, including modification or termination of probation. The petition shall be on a form provided by the board and shall state any facts or information as may be required by the board, including, but not limited to, proof of compliance with the terms and conditions of the underlying disciplinary order.

(b) The petitioner may file the petition on or after the expiration of the following timeframes, each of which commences on the effective date of the decision ordering that disciplinary action, or from
 the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety if the order, or any portion of it, is stayed by the board or by the superior court:

(1) Three years for reinstatement of a license or registration revoked or surrendered.

(2) Two years for early termination of probation of three years or more.

(3) Two years for modification of a condition of probation.

(4) One year for early termination of probation of less than three years.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 489, a person whose application for a license or registration has been denied by the board, for violations of Division
 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) of this chapter, may reapply to the board for a license or registration only after a period of three years has elapsed from the date of the denial.

(d) The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of production of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that they are entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(e) The board, when it is hearing the petition, or an administrative law judge sitting for the board, may consider all factors presented, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The offense for which the petitioner was disciplined.

(2) The petitioner’s activities during the time their license or registration
 was in good standing.

(3) The petitioner’s activities since the disciplinary action was taken.

(4) The petitioner’s rehabilitative efforts, general reputation for truth, and professional ability.

(f) The board may, without a hearing, deny a petition for early termination of probation or modification of penalty for any of the following reasons:

(1) The petitioner has failed to comply with the terms and conditions of the disciplinary order.

(2) The board is conducting an investigation of the petitioner while they are on probation.

(3) The petitioner has a subsequent arrest that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee and this arrest occurred while on probation.

(4) The petitioner’s probation with the board is currently tolled.

(g) For reinstatements, the board may require that the petitioner execute a form authorizing release to the board, or its designee, of all information concerning the petitioner’s current physical and mental condition. Information provided to the board pursuant to the release shall be confidential and shall not be subject to discovery or subpoena in any other proceeding, and shall not be admissible in any action, other than before the board, to determine the petitioner’s fitness to practice as required by Section 822.

(h) If the board issues an order to reinstate a license or registration, the petitioner shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Fingerprint submission requirements published by the board.

(2) Provisions set forth in Section 2985.

(3) All terms and conditions as specified by the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 33.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2963.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a psychologist, psychological associate, psychological testing technician, research psychoanalyst, or student research psychoanalyst is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the license or registration suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a license or registration when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw their
 plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 34.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.

Whenever the board revokes a license, it shall report the action to the National Practitioner Data Bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 35.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.3.

Any person required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, is not eligible for a license or registration by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 36.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.5.

The board may require any licensee or registrant it places on probation or whose license or registration it suspends to obtain additional continuing professional development, to pass an examination as specified in Section 2941, or both.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 38.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2964.6.

The board may require any licensee or registrant it places on probation to pay the monetary costs associated with probation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 40.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2965.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted by the board in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

2966.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a licensee or registrant is incarcerated due to conviction of a felony, regardless of whether the conviction has been appealed, their license or registration is automatically suspended during the period of incarceration.

(b) The board shall, immediately upon receipt of a certified copy of the licensee’s or registrant’s conviction, determine whether their license or registration has been automatically suspended due to incarceration, and notify the licensee or registrant of the suspension and of their right to a hearing on any board order of discipline or denial, as described in subdivision (e).

(c) Unless the conviction is for an offense specified in subdivision (d), the board shall hold a hearing to determine if the felony conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant. At the discretion of the board, the hearing shall be held by an administrative law judge sitting alone or with a panel of the board. The record of the proceedings resulting in the conviction, including a transcript of the testimony, shall be received in evidence.

(d) A conviction of any crime specified in Section 187, 261, or 288 of, or former Section 262 of, the Penal Code shall be conclusively presumed to be substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee or registrant and a hearing shall not be held
 pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) If the hearing in subdivision (c) determines that the conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee or registrant, then the license or registration shall remain suspended until either the time for appeal has elapsed if no appeal has been taken, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal or has otherwise become final, and until further order of the board.

(f) The board may order discipline or deny a license or registration in accordance with Section 2961 if any of the following occur:

(1) The time for appeal has elapsed.

(2) The judgment of conviction has been
 affirmed on appeal.

(3) A court order granting probation suspends the sentence, regardless of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw a plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, complaint, information, or indictment.

(4) The licensee or registrant elects to have the issue heard before any of the events specified in paragraphs (1), (2), or (3) occur. If the licensee or registrant elects to have the issue heard, the issue of penalty shall be heard at the hearing specified in subdivision (c).

(g) If the conviction is overturned on appeal, any discipline ordered pursuant to this section shall
 automatically cease. Nothing in this subdivision prohibits the board from pursuing disciplinary action based on a cause other than the overturned conviction.

(h) Upon its own motion or for good cause shown, the board may decline to set aside the suspension when it appears to be in the interest of justice to do so, with due regard to maintaining the integrity of and confidence in the psychology or
 psychoanalysis profession.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 42.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2969.

(a) (1) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a request for the medical records of a patient, that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the board, within 15 days of receiving the request and authorization, shall pay to the board a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the 15th day, unless the licensee is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause.

(2) A health care facility shall comply with a request for the medical records of a patient that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the board together with a notice citing this section and describing the penalties for failure to comply with this section. Failure to provide the authorizing patient’s medical records to the board within 30 days of receiving the request, authorization, and notice shall subject the health care facility to a civil penalty, payable to the board, of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the 30th day, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), unless the health care facility is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause. This paragraph shall not require health care facilities to assist the board in obtaining the patient’s authorization. The board shall pay the reasonable costs of copying the medical records.

(b) (1) A licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board shall pay to the board a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced after the date by which the court order requires the documents to be produced, unless it is determined that the order is unlawful or invalid. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board shall be tolled during the period the licensee is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(2) Any licensee who fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board, shall be subject to a civil penalty, payable to the board, of not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). The amount of the penalty shall be added to the licensee’s renewal fee if it is not paid by the next succeeding renewal date. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board shall be tolled during the period the licensee is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(3) A health care facility that fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of patient records to the board, that is accompanied by a notice citing this section and describing the penalties for failure to comply with this section, shall pay to the board a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day that the documents have not been produced, up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), after the date by which the court order requires the documents to be produced, unless it is determined that the order is unlawful or invalid. Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board against a licensee shall be tolled during the period the health care facility is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(4) Any health care facility that fails or refuses to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board, shall be subject to a civil penalty, payable to the board, of not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000). Any statute of limitations applicable to the filing of an accusation by the board against a licensee shall be tolled during the period the health care facility is out of compliance with the court order and during any related appeals.

(c) Multiple acts by a licensee in violation of subdivision (b) shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Multiple acts by a health care facility in violation of subdivision (b) shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) and shall be reported to the State Department of Health Services and shall be considered as grounds for disciplinary action with respect to licensure, including suspension or revocation of the license or certificate.

(d) A failure or refusal of a licensee to comply with a court order, issued in the enforcement of a subpoena, mandating the release of records to the board constitutes unprofessional conduct and is grounds for suspension or revocation of his or her license.

(e) The imposition of the civil penalties authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “health care facility” means a clinic or health facility licensed or exempt from licensure pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 836, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Penalties [2970. - 2971.]

2970.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 12.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

2971.

Whenever any person other than a licensed psychologist, registered psychological associate, psychological testing technician, research psychoanalyst, or student research psychoanalyst has engaged in any act or practice that constitutes an offense against this chapter, the superior court of any county, on application of the board, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that it shall be presumed that there is no adequate remedy at law, and that irreparable damage will occur if the violation continues. On the written request of the board, or on its own motion, the board may
 commence action in the superior court under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 43.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue [2980. - 2989.]

2980.

There is in the State Treasury the Psychology Fund. The board shall report to the Controller at the beginning of each calendar month, for the month preceding, the amount and source of all revenue received by it, pursuant to this chapter, and shall pay the entire amount thereof to the Treasurer for deposit into that fund. All revenue received by the board from fees authorized to be charged relating to the practice of psychology shall be deposited into that fund as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2981.

The money in the Psychology Fund shall be used for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 9.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.

(a) All licenses expire and become invalid at 12 midnight on the last day of February, 1980, and thereafter shall expire at 12 midnight of the last date of the two-year period from the date the license was issued.

(b) To renew an unexpired license, the licensee, on or before the date on which it would otherwise expire, shall apply for renewal on a form provided by the board, accompanied by the prescribed renewal fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 336, Sec. 1.   (AB 773)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2983.

Every person to whom a license is issued shall, as a condition precedent to its issuance, and in addition to any application, examination or other fee, pay the prescribed initial license fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 658, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2984.

Except as provided in Section 2985, a license that has expired may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration on filing of an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and payment of all accrued and unpaid renewal fees. If the license is renewed after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee, if any. Renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the application is filed, on the date on which all renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee, if any, is paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date provided in Section 2982 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire and become invalid if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 435, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2985.

(a) A suspended license or registration is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article. While the license or registration remains suspended, renewal does not entitle the licensee or registrant to engage in the practice of psychology or any activity authorized by registration.

(b) A revoked or surrendered license or registration is not subject to expiration and may not be renewed. If the license or registration is reinstated, the licensee or registrant shall pay the renewal fee in effect on the date on which the license or registration is reinstated, plus the delinquency fee, if any, accrued at the time the license or registration was
 revoked.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 45.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2986.

A psychology license is void if it is not renewed within three years from the expiration date. Once void, the board shall not restore or reissue that license. The person who held that license may apply for and obtain a new license if they meet the requirements of this chapter provided that they satisfy all of the following:

(a) They have not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license.

(b) They establish to the satisfaction of the board that they are qualified to practice psychology.

(c) They pay all required
 fees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 47.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2987.

The amount of the fees prescribed by this chapter shall be determined by the board, and shall be as follows:

(a) The application fee for a psychologist shall be two hundred thirty-six dollars ($236).

(b) The examination and reexamination fees for the examinations shall be the actual cost to the board of developing, purchasing, and grading of each examination, plus the actual cost to the board of administering each examination.

(c) The application fee for the California Psychology Law and Ethics Examination (CPLEE) shall be one hundred twenty-seven dollars ($127).

(d) The initial license fee for a psychologist shall be two hundred thirty-one dollars ($231).

(e) The biennial renewal fee for a psychologist shall be seven hundred ninety-five dollars ($795). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of one thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100).

(f) The application fee for registration as a registered psychological associate under Section 2913 shall be four hundred twenty-four dollars ($424).

(g) The annual renewal fee for registration of a psychological associate shall be two hundred twenty-four dollars ($224). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to
 a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400).

(h) The duplicate license or registration fee is five dollars ($5).

(i) The delinquency fee is 50 percent of the renewal fee for each license type, not to exceed three hundred ninety-seven dollars and fifty cents ($397.50).

(j) The endorsement fee is five dollars ($5).

(k) The file transfer fee is ten dollars ($10).

(l) The registration fee for a psychological testing technician shall be seventy-five dollars ($75).

(m) The annual renewal fee for a psychological testing technician is seventy-five
 dollars ($75).

(n) The fee to add or change a supervisor for a psychological testing technician is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(o) The fee for fingerprint hard card processing for out-of-state applicants shall be one hundred eighty-four dollars ($184). Applicants shall also pay the actual cost to the board of processing the fingerprint hard card with the Department of Justice and Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(p) The fee for a psychological associate to add or change their supervisor shall be two hundred ten dollars ($210). The fee shall be the actual cost to the board of processing the addition or change.

(q) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may reduce
 any fee prescribed by this section, when, in its discretion, the board deems it administratively appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 48.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2987.2.

(a) In addition to the fees charged pursuant to Section 2987 for the biennial renewal of a license, the board shall collect an additional fee of twenty dollars ($20) at the time of renewal. The board shall transfer this amount to the Controller who shall deposit the funds in the Mental Health Practitioner Education Fund.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.   (AB 1188)   Effective October 7, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2987.5.

Every person licensed under this chapter is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee in any one of the following instances:

While engaged in full-time active service in the Army, Navy, Air Force or Marines, or in the United States Public Health Service, or while a volunteer in the Peace Corps or Vista.

Every person exempted from the payment of the renewal fee by this section shall not engage in any private practice and shall become liable for the fee for the current renewal period upon the completion of his or her period of full-time active service and shall have a period of 60 days after becoming liable within which to pay the fee before the delinquency fee becomes applicable. Any person who completes his or her period of full-time active service within 60 days of the end of a renewal period is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee for that period.

The time spent in that full-time active service or full-time training and active service shall not be included in the computation of the three-year period for renewal of a license provided in Section 2986.

The exemption provided by this section shall not be applicable if the person engages in any practice for compensation other than full-time service in the Army, Navy, Air Force or Marines or in the United States Public Health Service or the Peace Corps or Vista.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 829, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.

A licensed psychologist who for reasons, including, but not limited to, retirement, ill health, or absence from the state, is not engaged in the practice of psychology, may apply to the board to request that their license be placed on an inactive status. A licensed psychologist who holds an inactive license shall pay a biennial renewal fee, fixed by the board, of two hundred twenty-one dollars ($221). The board may adopt regulations to set the fee at a higher amount, up to a maximum of four hundred dollars ($400). A psychologist holding an inactive license shall be exempt from continuing education requirements specified in Section 2915, but shall otherwise be subject to this chapter and shall not engage in the practice of
 psychology in this state. Licensees on inactive status who have not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure and have completed the continuing education requirements specified in Section 2915 may, upon their request, have their license to practice psychology placed on active status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 3.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.5.

(a) The board may issue, upon an application prescribed by the board and payment of a fee not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75), a retired license to a psychologist who holds a current license issued by the board, or one capable of being renewed, and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise restricted by the board or subject to discipline under this chapter.

(b) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active license is required. A psychologist holding a retired license shall be permitted to use the title “psychologist, retired” or “retired psychologist.” The designation of retired shall not be abbreviated in any
 way.

(c) A retired license shall not be subject to renewal.

(d) The holder of a retired license may apply to obtain an active status license as follows:

(1) If that retired license was issued less than three years prior to the application date, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(A) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial or discipline of a license.

(B) Pays the renewal fee required by this chapter.

(C) Completes the continuing professional development required for the renewal of a license within two years of the date of application for restoration.

(D) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established by the board.

(2) Where the applicant has held a retired license for three or more years, the applicant shall do all of the following:

(A) Submit a complete application for a new license.

(B) Take and pass the California Psychology Law and Ethics Examination.

(C) Pay all fees required to obtain a new license.

(D) Comply with the fingerprint submission requirements established by the board.

(E) Be deemed to have met the educational and experience requirements of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section
 2914.

(F) Establish that he or she has not been subject to denial or discipline of a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 11.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2988.7.

(a) The board may, in its discretion, accept the offer of a surrender of a license. The acceptance of the offer of a surrender shall be in writing.

(b) The license surrender shall be public information.

(c) The holder of the license that was surrendered pursuant to this section may petition the board for reinstatement after a period of not less than one year after the effective date of the acceptance.

(d) The reinstatement proceeding shall be conducted pursuant to Section 2965.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 20.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2989.

The fees in this article shall be fixed by the board and shall be set forth with the regulations which are duly adopted under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 888, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Psychological Corporations [2995. - 2999.]

2995.
